Colorado, session 2026A, HB1240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration.
(1) The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado's earned income tax credit is one of the state's most
effective tools for supporting working families, reducing poverty, and
encouraging workforce participation;
(b) In recent years, the General Assembly has taken important
steps to modernize and expand the earned income tax credit, including
extending eligibility to younger workers who were previously excluded;
(c) Fairness requires that Colorado's tax policy treat older working
adults with the same respect and recognition afforded to younger workers;
(d) Many Coloradans over the age of sixty-five remain active in
the workforce, often out of financial necessity, and these older workers
contribute to their communities, support local economies, and, in many
cases, help sustain multigenerational households;
(e) Under current law, age-based eligibility limits prevent many
low- and moderate-income older workers from claiming the earned
income tax credit, even though they meet the same income and work
requirements as younger filers;
(f) The disparity in who can claim the earned income tax credit
creates an inequitable outcome in a program designed to reward work and
support those with limited earnings;
-2- HB26-1240

(g) Aligning eligibility for the earned income tax credit across age
groups completes the policy direction the General Assembly has already
embraced by ensuring that the earned income tax credit operates as a
consistent, work-based support for all eligible Coloradans, regardless of
age;
(h) Aligning eligibility for the earned income tax credit across age
groups represents a modest and responsible fiscal investment;
(i) The structure of the earned income tax credit ensures that
benefits of the credit target low- and moderate-income workers and flow
directly back into local communities through everyday spending;
(j) Supporting older workers through the earned income tax credit
helps promote financial stability, reduce reliance on more costly
emergency assistance, and strengthen Colorado's economy; and
(k) When working seniors and grandparents can better meet basic
needs, entire families and communities benefit.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-123.5, amend
(3.5)(b)(I) and (3.5)(c) introductory portion; and add (2.7)(d) as follows:
39-22-123.5. Earned income tax credit - legislative declaration
- repeal.
(2.7) (d) (I) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2028, A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL IS ALLOWED AN EARNED
INCOME TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE TAXES DUE UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22
THAT IS EQUAL TO THE APPLICABLE PERCENTAGE, SET FORTH IN
SUBSECTION (2.7)(d)(II) OF THIS SECTION, OF THE FEDERAL CREDIT THAT
THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WOULD HAVE BEEN ALLOWED UNDER SECTION
32 (n)(2) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, NOTWITHSTANDING THE DATE
LIMITATION SET FORTH IN SECTION 32 (n) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
-3- HB26-1240

CODE AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 9621 (a) OF THE "AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN
ACT OF 2021", PUB.L. 117-2.
(II) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3.5) OF THIS
SECTION, THE PERCENTAGE USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNT OF CREDIT
THAT CAN BE CLAIMED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2.7)(d)(I) OF THIS
SECTION IS TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT.
(3.5) (b) (I) For the income tax year commencing on January 1,
2025, the percentage of the federal earned income tax credit that the
resident individual claimed or could have claimed that is used to calculate
the amount of earned income tax credit allowed pursuant to subsections
(2)(d), (2.5)(e), and (2.7)(c), AND (2.7)(d) of this section is increased by
fifteen percentage points if the estimated adjustment factor is equal to or
greater than two percent.
(c) For income tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2026,
the percentage of the federal earned income tax credit that the resident
individual claimed or could have claimed that is used to calculate the
amount of earned income tax credit allowed pursuant to subsections
(2)(d), (2.5)(e), and (2.7)(c), AND (2.7)(d) of this section is increased as
follows if the estimated adjustment factor is as follows:
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-4- HB26-1240

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1240